New York, session 2025-2026, S8678.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 365-a of the social services law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (oo) to read as follows: 3 (oo) pharmacological treatment for hyperhidrosis, when such treatment 4 is ordered by a physician, registered physician assistant, or registered 5 nurse practitioner; provided, however, that the provisions of this para- 6 graph shall not take effect unless all necessary approvals under federal 7 law and regulation have been obtained to receive federal financial 8 participation in the costs of health care services provided pursuant to 9 this paragraph. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to modify 10 any licensure, certification or scope of practice provision under title 11 eight of the education law. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect April 1, 2027. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14125-02-6